Montana, session 2025, HB362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 70-23-403, MCA, is amended to read:
"70-23-403. Common elements -- undivided interest of unit owner. (1) Each unit owner shall must
be entitled to an undivided interest in the common elements in the percentage expressed in the declaration.
Such The percentage shall must be in the approximate relation that the value of the unit at the date of the
declaration bears to the then combined value of all the units having an interest in the particular common
elements. Value need not conform to market value.
(2) The percentage of undivided interest of each unit owner in the common elements as expressed
in a declaration shall may not be altered unless all 75% of the unit owners having an interest in the particular
common element agree thereto to the altered percentage and record an amendment to the declaration setting
forth the altered percentage of each unit owner having an interest."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 362